Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5588XS (9) 91 dg/jh S.F. 2197 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 554J.1 Definitions. 1 1. âAccount holderâ means the individual who is associated 2 with the mobile device. 3 2. âAge categoryâ means one of the following categories of 4 individuals based on age: 5 a. âAdultâ which means an individual who is at least 6 eighteen years old. 7 b. âChildâ which means an individual who is under thirteen 8 years old. 9 c. âOlder teenagerâ which means an individual who is at 10 least sixteen years old and under eighteen years old. 11 d. âYounger teenagerâ which means an individual who is at 12 least thirteen years old and under sixteen years old. 13 3. âAge category dataâ means information about an account 14 holderâs age category that is collected by an app store 15 provider and is shared with a developer. 16 4. âAge ratingâ means one or more classifications that 17 assess the suitability of an appâs content and functions for 18 different age groups. 19 5. âAppâ means a software application or electronic service 20 that a user may run or direct on a mobile device. 21 6. âApp storeâ means a publicly available internet site, 22 software application, or electronic service that allows an 23 account holder to download an app from a third-party developer 24 onto a mobile device. 25 7. âApp store providerâ means a person that owns, operates, 26 or controls an app store that allows account holders in the 27 state to download apps onto a mobile device. 28 8. âContent descriptionâ means a description of the specific 29 content elements or functions that informed an appâs age 30 rating. 31 9. âDeveloperâ means a person that owns or controls an app 32 made available through an app store in the state. 33 10. âKnowinglyâ means to act with actual knowledge or 34 to act with knowledge fairly inferred based on objective 35 -1- LSB 5588XS (9) 91 dg/jh 1/ 14 S.F. 2197 circumstances. 1 11. âMinorâ means an individual under eighteen years old 2 unless the individual is married or legally emancipated. 3 12. âMinor accountâ means an account with an app store 4 provider that is established by an individual who is a minor. 5 A minor account must be affiliated with a parent account. 6 13. âMobile deviceâ means a phone or general-purpose tablet 7 described by all of the following: 8 a. The phone or general-purpose tablet provides cellular or 9 wireless connectivity. 10 b. The phone or general-purpose tablet is capable of 11 connecting to the internet. 12 c. The phone or general-purpose tablet runs a mobile 13 operating system. 14 d. The phone or general-purpose tablet is capable of running 15 apps through the mobile operating system. 16 14. âMobile operating systemâ means software that does all 17 of the following: 18 a. Manages mobile device hardware resources. 19 b. Provides common services for mobile device programs. 20 c. Controls memory allocation. 21 d. Provides interfaces for apps to access device 22 functionality. 23 15. âParentâ means, with respect to a minor, an individual 24 who is reasonably believed to be a parent, a legal guardian, an 25 individual with legal custody, or any other individual who has 26 the legal authority to make decisions on behalf of the minor. 27 16. âParent accountâ means an account with an app store 28 provider that is described by all of the following: 29 a. The account is verified to be established by an 30 individual the app store provider has determined through 31 the app store providerâs age verification methods that 32 the individual is at least eighteen years old, married, or 33 emancipated. 34 b. The account may be affiliated with one or more minor 35 -2- LSB 5588XS (9) 91 dg/jh 2/ 14 S.F. 2197 accounts. 1 17. âParental consent disclosureâ means a statement about 2 an app or an in-app purchase containing all of the following 3 information: 4 a. If the app store provider has an age rating for the app 5 or in-app purchase, the appâs or in-app purchaseâs age rating. 6 b. If the app store provider has a content description for 7 the app or in-app purchase, the appâs or in-app purchaseâs 8 content description. 9 c. A description of all of the following: 10 (1) The personal data collected by the app from an account 11 holder. 12 (2) The personal data shared by the app with a third party. 13 d. If personal data is collected by the app, the methods 14 implemented by the developer to protect the personal data. 15 18. âSignificant changeâ means a material modification to 16 an appâs terms of service or privacy policy that is described 17 by any of the following: 18 a. The modification changes the categories of data 19 collected, stored, or shared. 20 b. The modification alters the appâs age rating or content 21 descriptions. 22 c. The modification adds new monetization features, 23 including any of the following: 24 (1) In-app purchases. 25 (2) Advertisements. 26 d. The modification materially changes any of the following: 27 (1) The appâs functionality. 28 (2) The appâs user experience. 29 19. âVerifiable parental consentâ means authorization that 30 is described by all of the following: 31 a. The authorization is provided by a parent account. 32 b. The authorization is given after the app store provider 33 has clearly and conspicuously provided the parental consent 34 disclosure as part of the app download, purchase, or in-app 35 -3- LSB 5588XS (9) 91 dg/jh 3/ 14 S.F. 2197 purchase process. 1 c. The authorization requires the parent to make an 2 affirmative choice to do any of the following: 3 (1) Grant consent. 4 (2) Decline consent. 5 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 554J.2 App store provider 6 requirements. 7 1. An app store provider shall do all of the following: 8 a. At the time an individual who is located in the state 9 creates an account with the app store provider, the app store 10 provider shall do all of the following: 11 (1) Request age category information from the individual. 12 (2) Verify the individualâs age category using any of the 13 following: 14 (a) Commercially available methods that are reasonably 15 designed to ensure accuracy. 16 (b) An age verification method or process that complies with 17 rules adopted by the attorney general. 18 b. If the app store provider determines the individual is a 19 minor, the app store provider shall do all of the following: 20 (1) Require the account to be affiliated with a parent 21 account. 22 (2) Obtain verifiable parental consent from the holder of 23 the affiliated parent account each time before allowing the 24 minor to any of the following: 25 (a) Download an app. 26 (b) Purchase an app. 27 (c) Make an in-app purchase. 28 c. After receiving notice of a significant change from 29 a developer, the app store provider shall do all of the 30 following: 31 (1) Notify the account holder of the significant change. 32 (2) For a minor account, all of the following: 33 (a) Notify the parent account. 34 (b) Obtain renewed verifiable parental consent. 35 -4- LSB 5588XS (9) 91 dg/jh 4/ 14 S.F. 2197 d. Provide to a developer, in response to a request 1 authorized under section 554J.3, all of the following: 2 (1) Age category data for an account holder located in the 3 state. 4 (2) The status of verifiable parental consent for a minor 5 located in the state. 6 e. Notify a developer when a parent revokes verifiable 7 parental consent. 8 f. Protect age category data and any associated verification 9 data through all of the following: 10 (1) Limiting collection and processing to data necessary to 11 all of the following: 12 (a) Verifying an account holderâs age category. 13 (b) Obtaining verifiable parental consent. 14 (c) Maintaining compliance records. 15 (2) Transmitting age category data using industry-standard 16 encryption protocols that ensure data integrity and data 17 confidentiality. 18 2. An app store provider shall not do any of the following: 19 a. Enforce a contract or terms of service against a minor 20 unless the app store provider has obtained verifiable parental 21 consent. 22 b. Knowingly misrepresent the information in the parental 23 consent disclosure. 24 c. Share age category data and any associated data except as 25 required by this chapter or otherwise required by law. 26 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 554J.3 Developer requirements. 27 1. A developer shall do all of the following: 28 a. Verify through the app storeâs data sharing methods the 29 age category data of account holders located in the state, and 30 for a minorâs account, whether verifiable parental consent has 31 been obtained. 32 b. Notify app store providers of a significant change to an 33 app. 34 c. Use age category data received through the app storeâs 35 -5- LSB 5588XS (9) 91 dg/jh 5/ 14 S.F. 2197 data sharing methods to do all of the following: 1 (1) Enforce any developer-created, age-related 2 restrictions, safety-related features, or defaults. 3 (2) Ensure compliance with applicable laws and regulations. 4 d. Request age category data or verifiable parental consent 5 at all of the following times: 6 (1) At the time an account holder downloads an app. 7 (2) At the time an account holder purchases an app. 8 (3) When implementing a significant change to the app. 9 (4) When necessitated to comply with applicable law. 10 2. A developer may request age category data at all of the 11 following times: 12 a. No more than once during each twelve-month period to 13 verify any of the following: 14 (1) The accuracy of age category data associated with an 15 account holder. 16 (2) Continued account use within the age category. 17 b. When there is reasonable suspicion of any of the 18 following: 19 (1) An account transfer. 20 (2) Misuse outside of the age category. 21 c. At the time an account holder creates a new account with 22 the developer. 23 3. When implementing any developer-created, age-related 24 restrictions, safety-related features, or defaults, a developer 25 shall use the lowest age category indicated by any of the 26 following: 27 a. Age category data received through the app storeâs data 28 sharing methods. 29 b. Age data independently collected by the developer. 30 4. A developer shall not do any of the following: 31 a. Enforce a contract or terms of service against a minor 32 unless the developer has verified through an app storeâs data 33 sharing methods that verifiable parental consent has been 34 obtained. 35 -6- LSB 5588XS (9) 91 dg/jh 6/ 14 S.F. 2197 b. Knowingly misrepresent any information in the parental 1 consent disclosure. 2 c. Share age category data with any person. 3 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 554J.4 Attorney general ââ rulemaking 4 authority. 5 The attorney general shall adopt rules to establish 6 processes and means by which an app store provider may verify 7 an account holderâs age category as required under section 8 554J.2. 9 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 554J.5 Enforcement. 10 1. a. A minor, or the parent of a minor, who has been 11 harmed by a violation of this chapter may bring a civil action 12 against an app store provider or a developer. 13 b. In an action brought under this subsection, the court 14 shall award a prevailing plaintiff any combination of the 15 following: 16 (1) The greater of actual damages or one thousand dollars 17 per violation. 18 (2) Punitive damages if the violation was egregious. 19 (3) Reasonable attorney fees. 20 (4) Court costs. 21 2. a. A violation of this chapter is an unfair practice 22 under section 714.16 subject to the civil penalty limitation in 23 paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (1). 24 b. In addition to any other available remedy, the attorney 25 general may bring an action against an app store provider or a 26 developer to do any combination of the following: 27 (1) Recover a civil penalty not to exceed seven thousand 28 five hundred dollars per violation. 29 (2) Restrain or enjoin the app store provider or developer 30 from violating this chapter. 31 (3) Seek injunctive relief. 32 (4) Recover reasonable attorney fees. 33 (5) Recover litigation costs and the costs of investigating 34 the violation. 35 -7- LSB 5588XS (9) 91 dg/jh 7/ 14 S.F. 2197 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 554J.6 Safe harbor. 1 1. A developer is not liable for a violation of this chapter 2 if the developer demonstrates that the developer did all of the 3 following: 4 a. Relied in good faith on applicable age category data 5 received through an app storeâs data sharing methods. 6 b. Relied in good faith on notification from an app store 7 provider that verifiable parental consent was obtained if the 8 account holder was a minor. 9 c. Complied with the requirements described in section 10 554J.3. 11 2. In determining an appâs age rating and content 12 description for purposes of section 554J.3, a developer is not 13 liable for a violation of this chapter if the developer uses 14 widely adopted industry standards to determine the appâs age 15 category and content description and applies the standards 16 consistently and in good faith. 17 3. The safe harbor described in this section applies only 18 to actions brought under this chapter, and does not limit a 19 developer or app store providerâs liability under any other 20 applicable law. 21 4. Nothing in this chapter shall displace any other 22 available remedies or rights authorized under the laws of this 23 state or the United States. 24 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 554J.7 Severability. 25 The provisions of this chapter are severable pursuant to 26 section 4.12. 27 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 554J.8 Application and limitations. 28 This chapter shall not be construed to do any of the 29 following: 30 1. Prevent an app store provider or developer from taking 31 reasonable measures to do any of the following: 32 a. Block, detect, or prevent distribution of any of the 33 following to a minor: 34 (1) Unlawful material. 35 -8- LSB 5588XS (9) 91 dg/jh 8/ 14 S.F. 2197 (2) Obscene material. 1 (3) Other harmful material. 2 b. Block or filter spam. 3 c. Prevent criminal activity. 4 d. Protect app store or app security. 5 2. Require an app store provider to disclose user 6 information to a developer beyond age category data. 7 3. Allow an app store provider or developer to implement 8 measures required by this chapter in a manner that is 9 arbitrary, capricious, anticompetitive, or unlawful. 10 4. Require an app store provider or developer to obtain 11 verifiable parental consent for an app that is described by all 12 of the following: 13 a. The app provides direct access to emergency services, 14 including any of the following: 15 (1) 911. 16 (2) A crisis hotline. 17 (3) Emergency assistance services legally available to 18 minors. 19 b. The app limits data collection to information necessary 20 to provide emergency services in compliance with 15 U.S.C. 21 Â§6501, et seq. 22 c. The app provides access without requiring any of the 23 following: 24 (1) Account creation. 25 (2) Collection of unnecessary personal information. 26 d. The app is operated by or in partnership with any of the 27 following: 28 (1) A government entity. 29 (2) A nonprofit organization. 30 (3) An authorized emergency service provider. 31 5. Require a developer to collect, retain, re-identify, 32 or link any information beyond what is necessary to verify 33 age category data as required by this chapter and collected, 34 retained, re-identified, or linked in the developerâs ordinary 35 -9- LSB 5588XS (9) 91 dg/jh 9/ 14 S.F. 2197 course of business. 1 6. Relieve a developer of its obligation to conduct age 2 verification as otherwise required by law. A developer may 3 rely on age category data obtained under this chapter to the 4 extent those signals satisfy the requirements of applicable 5 law. 6 Sec. 9. Section 714.16, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 7 by adding the following new paragraph: 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . t. It is an unlawful practice for a person 9 to violate chapter 554J. 10 Sec. 10. APPLICABILITY. The following apply December 1, 11 2026: 12 The sections of this Act enacting sections 554J.2 and 13 554J.3. 14